Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Plans, Agreements, and Referendums Regarding
Social Security Coverage

47-18-40.
Agreement between state and federal government for state employees; like agreements between federal government and interstate instrumentalities; division of retirement system.

The state agency, with the approval of the Governor, is authorized to enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the secretary of health and human services, consistent with the terms of this chapter, for the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance system to employees of the political subdivisions of this state and with respect to services specified in such agreement which constitute employment within the meaning of this chapter. Such agreement may contain such provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date, modification and termination of the agreement, administration, and other appropriate provisions as the state agency and the secretary of health and human services shall agree upon. Except as may be otherwise required by or under the Social Security Act as to the services to be covered, such agreement shall provide that:

Benefits shall be provided for employees whose services are covered by the agreement, and their dependents and survivors, on the same basis as though such services constituted employment within the meaning of Title II of the Social Security Act;

At such times as may be prescribed under the Social Security Act, the state shall pay contributions to the secretary of the treasury with respect to wages equal to the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, if the services covered by the agreement constituted employment within the meaning of that Act;

Such agreement shall be effective as of the date specified in the agreement, provided that it shall not be effective prior to the date permitted by the federal Social Security Act with respect to services in employment covered by the agreement;

All services which (A) constitute employment, (B) are performed in the employ of the state or a political subdivision of the state, and (C) are covered by a plan which is in conformity with the terms of the agreement and has been approved by the state agency under Code Section 47-18-41 shall be covered by the agreement; and

As modified, the agreement shall include all services described in paragraph (4) of this subsection and performed by individuals in positions covered by a retirement system with respect to which the Governor has issued a certificate to the secretary of health and human services, pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 47-18-42.

Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other states is authorized, upon the granting of like authority by such other states:

To enter into an agreement with the secretary of health and human services whereby the benefits of the federal old-age, survivors, and disability insurance system shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality;

To require its employees to pay, and for that purpose to deduct from their wages, contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required to pay under subsection (a) of Code Section 47-18-41 if they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section; and

To make payments in accordance with federal law.

Such agreement, to the extent practicable, shall be consistent with the terms and provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section and other provisions of this chapter.

Pursuant to Section 218(d)(6) of the Social Security Act and for purposes of this chapter, at the election of the Governor, any retirement system which covers employees of more than one political subdivision or employees of the state and one or more political subdivisions shall be deemed a separate retirement system with respect to each such political subdivision or as to the state and one or more political subdivisions with positions covered by such retirement system. Pursuant to Section 218(p) of the Social Security Act and also for the purposes of this chapter, any retirement system which covers positions of policemen or firemen, or both, and other positions shall, if the Governor so elects, be deemed to be a separate retirement system with respect to the positions of such policemen or firemen, or both, as the case may be.

For the purposes of this chapter, any retirement system established by this state or any political subdivision thereof or established by an Act of the General Assembly which, on, before, or after March 21, 1958, is divided into two divisions or parts, one of which is composed of positions of members of such system who desire coverage under the agreement under this chapter and the other of which is composed of positions of members of such system who do not desire such coverage, shall, upon the Governor’s authorization of a referendum for a retirement system pursuant to Section 218 of the Social Security Act, be deemed to be a separate retirement system with respect to each such division or part. At the election of the Governor, the referendum and the division of such system may occur simultaneously as authorized by Section 218(d)(7) of the Social Security Act. The positions of individuals who become members of such system after such coverage is extended shall be included in such division or part of such system composed of members desiring such coverage. The position of any individual which is covered by any such retirement system, if such individual is ineligible to become a member of such system on August 1, 1956, or, if later, the day he or she first occupies such position, shall be deemed to be covered by the separate retirement system consisting of the positions of members of the division or part who do not desire coverage under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 3; Ga. L. 1956, p. 75, § 3; Ga. L. 1957, p. 586, § 1; Code 1933, § 99-2103, enacted by Ga. L. 1958, p. 198, §§ 2, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1964, p. 303, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 12/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 3/HB 997.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in subsection (e), substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” in the second and third sentences.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council” for “the Council” in the second sentence of subsection (e). The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Act” for “act” at the end of paragraph (a)(2); substituted “in accordance with federal law” for “to the secretary of the treasury in accordance with such agreement, including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with such agreements” at the end of paragraph (b)(3); inserted “or she” in the last sentence of subsection (d); and deleted former subsection (e) which read: “The position of any member of the division or part of the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia who does not desire coverage may be transferred to the separate retirement fund composed of positions of members who do desire coverage upon such terms and conditions and at such time as permitted by federal law. In the event of such transfer, the employee contributions of such member required for social security coverage shall be deducted by the Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia and remitted to the state agency, together with the required employer contributions. The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay, from funds appropriated or otherwise available for the operation of the superior courts, the required employer contributions on any such transferred member.”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.” Accordingly, the amendment to subsection (e) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64, was not given effect.

47-18-41.
Plans for old-age, survivors, and disability insurance coverage submitted by state political subdivisions; contents; approval; contributions required.

Each political subdivision of the state is authorized to submit for approval by the state agency a plan for extending the benefits of Title II of the Social Security Act to employees of such political subdivision. The adjutant general, acting on behalf of the state, is authorized to submit and enter into a similar plan with the state agency for extending such benefits to the civilian employees of the National Guard units of this state, who are, for the purposes of this chapter, deemed to be a separate coverage group as provided for in the federal Social Security Act; provided, however, that nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to deem or designate the civilian employees of the National Guard units of this state to be employees of this state. Each such plan and any amendments thereof shall be approved by the state agency if it finds that such plan, as amended, is in conformity with such requirements as are provided in regulations of the state agency, except that no such plan shall be approved unless:

It is in conformity with the requirements of the Social Security Act and with the agreement entered into under Code Section 47-18-40;

It provides that all services which constitute employment and are performed in the employ of a political subdivision by employees thereof shall be covered by the plan except that it may exclude services performed by individuals to whom Section 218(c)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act is applicable;

It specifies the sources from which the funds necessary to make the payments required by paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Code section and by subsection (d) of this Code section are expected to be derived and contains reasonable assurance that such sources will be adequate for such purpose;

It provides for such methods of administration of the plan by the political subdivision as are found by the state agency to be necessary for the proper and efficient administration of the plan;

It provides that the political subdivision will make such reports in such form and containing such information as the state agency may from time to time require and will comply with such provisions as the state agency or the secretary of health and human services may from time to time find necessary in order to assure the correctness and verification of such reports; and

It authorizes the state agency to terminate the plan in its entirety, in the discretion of the state agency, if it finds that there has been a failure to comply with any provision contained in such plan, such termination to take effect at the expiration of such notice and on such conditions as may be provided by regulations of the state agency and which are consistent with the Social Security Act, provided that such conditions as may be provided by the regulations of the state agency for such termination shall assure that the state shall not incur any debt or loss in relation to any amounts due the state from other provisions of the Social Security Act, including grants in aid for public assistance and for maternal and child welfare.

The state agency shall not finally refuse to approve a plan submitted by a political subdivision under subsection (a) of this Code section and shall not terminate an approved plan without reasonable notice and opportunity for hearings to the political subdivision affected thereby.

Each political subdivision as to which a plan has been approved under this Code section shall pay to the federal Social Security Administration contributions in the amounts and at the rates specified in the applicable agreement entered into by the state agency under Code Section 47-18-40.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 294, § 4; Ga. L. 1956, p. 75, § 4; Ga. L. 1956, p. 576, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1963, p. 641, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 304, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 832, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3/SB 296; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 4/HB 997.

The 2010 amendments. —

The first 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, substituted “state treasurer” for “director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services” throughout subsections (e) and (f). The second 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, rewrote subsection (c) and deleted former subsections (d) through (h). See the Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

Code Commission notes.

The amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 3, irreconcilably conflicted with and was treated as superseded by Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 4. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

47-18-42.
Referendum on the question of coverage of certain groups of employees.

The Governor is empowered to authorize a referendum, and to designate any agency or individual to supervise its conduct, in accordance with the requirements of Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act, on the question of whether service in positions covered by a retirement system established by the state or by a political subdivision shall be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter. The notice of referendum required by Section 218(d)(3)(C) of the Social Security Act to be given to employees shall contain or shall be accompanied by a statement, in such form and such detail as the agency or individual designated to supervise the referendum shall deem necessary and sufficient to inform the employees of the rights which will accrue to them and their dependents and survivors and the liabilities to which they will be subject, if their services are included under an agreement under this chapter.

Upon receiving evidence satisfactory to him that with respect to any such referendum the conditions specified in Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act have been met, the Governor is authorized so to certify to the secretary of health and human services.

History.

Ga. L. 1956, p. 75, § 5.

47-18-43.
Referendum on the question of coverage of positions covered by Chapter 12 of this title.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the Governor is empowered to authorize a referendum in accordance with the requirements of Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act on the question of whether services in positions covered by the District Attorneys Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 12 of this title, shall be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter with an effective date of July 1, 1956. If the referendum results in an affirmative vote, employee contributions required for social security coverage shall be deducted by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia from the compensation or other funds due the employee. Such employee deductions shall be based on an affidavit from each individual as to the total wages received by him or her each calendar quarter as district attorney. Such affidavit shall be forwarded to the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia before the fifth day of the month following the end of each calendar quarter. If any district attorney fails to submit the required affidavit to the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia within the required time, any and all funds due such individual shall be withheld by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia until an appropriate affidavit has been received. The Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay the required employer contribution from the funds appropriated or otherwise available.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 172, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 13/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1248, § 5/HB 997.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of the State of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” throughout this Code section, inserted “or her” in the third sentence, and substituted “or otherwise available” for “for the operation of the superior courts of the state” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “and shall be remitted to the state agency, together with the required employer contributions” following “employee” at the end of the second sentence.

47-18-44.
Referendum on the question of coverage of positions covered by Chapter 8 of this title.

The Governor is empowered to authorize a referendum in accordance with the requirements of Section 218(d)(3) of the Social Security Act on the question of whether services in positions covered by the Superior Court Judges Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 8 of this title, shall be excluded from or included under an agreement under this chapter with an effective date of July 1, 1956. If the referendum results in an affirmative vote, employee contributions required for social security coverage shall be deducted by The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia and remitted to the state agency, together with the required employer contributions. The Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia is authorized and directed to pay the required employer contribution from the funds appropriated for the operation of the superior courts of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 172, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 19; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 753, § 14/SB 109; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in the first sentence, deleted a comma following “Social Security Act” and substituted “Council of Superior Court Judges of Georgia” for “commissioner of administrative services” in the second and third sentences.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “The Council” for “the Council” in the second sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”